HW1/able.lexc
Multichar_Symbols [V] [N] [A] [Pl] [Sg] [1p] [2p] [3p]

LEXICON Root

Verb ;

LEXICON Verb

think   V;
excuse  V;
run     V;
fly     V;
watch   V;

LEXICON V

+able   A ;
[V]:0  VInfl;

LEXICON A
+ity   N ;
[A]:0  #;

LEXICON N
[N]:0 NInfl;

LEXICON NInfl
        [Pl]:+s #;
	[Sg]:0 #;

LEXICON VInfl
[1p][Sg]:0 #;
[2p][Sg]:0 #;
[3p][Sg]:+s #;
